Illinois, session 104th, SB3442.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 9-1, 9-3, and 12-3.05 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/9-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 9-1)7    Sec. 9-1. First degree murder. 8    (a) A person who kills an individual without lawful 9justification commits first degree murder if, in performing 10the acts which cause the death: 11        (1) he or she either intends to kill or do great bodily 12    harm to that individual or another, or knows that such 13    acts will cause death to that individual or another; or 14        (2) he or she knows that such acts create a strong 15    probability of death or great bodily harm to that 16    individual or another; or 17        (3) he or she, acting alone or with one or more 18    participants, commits or attempts to commit a forcible 19    felony other than second degree murder, and in the course 20    of or in furtherance of such crime or flight therefrom, he 21    or she or another participant causes the death of a 22    person; or . 23        (4) he or she violates both subsection (d) of Section   SB3442- 2 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1    11-501 and Section 11-601.5 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 2    and such acts are the proximate cause of the death of the 3    individual. 4    (b) (Blank). 5    (b-5) (Blank). 6    (c) (Blank). 7    (d) (Blank). 8    (e) (Blank). 9    (f) (Blank). 10    (g) (Blank). 11    (h) (Blank). 12    (h-5) (Blank). 13    (i) (Blank). 14    (j) (Blank). 15    (k) (Blank). 16(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 17    (720 ILCS 5/9-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 9-3)18    Sec. 9-3. Involuntary Manslaughter and Reckless Homicide. 19    (a) A person who unintentionally kills an individual 20without lawful justification commits involuntary manslaughter 21if his acts whether lawful or unlawful which cause the death 22are such as are likely to cause death or great bodily harm to 23some individual, and he performs them recklessly, except in 24cases in which the cause of the death consists of the driving 25of a motor vehicle or operating a snowmobile, all-terrain   SB3442- 3 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1vehicle, or watercraft, in which case the person commits 2reckless homicide. A person commits reckless homicide if he or 3she unintentionally kills an individual while driving a 4vehicle and using an incline in a roadway, such as a railroad 5crossing, bridge approach, or hill, to cause the vehicle to 6become airborne. 7    (b) (Blank).8    (c) (Blank).9    (d) Sentence.10        (1) Involuntary manslaughter is a Class 3 felony.11        (2) Reckless homicide is a Class 3 felony.12    (e) (Blank).13    (e-2) Except as provided in subsection (e-3), in cases 14involving reckless homicide in which the offense is committed 15upon a public thoroughfare where children pass going to and 16from school when a school crossing guard is performing 17official duties, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a 18person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 19sentenced to a term of not less than 3 years and not more than 2014 years.21    (e-3) In cases involving reckless homicide in which (i) 22the offense is committed upon a public thoroughfare where 23children pass going to and from school when a school crossing 24guard is performing official duties and (ii) the defendant 25causes the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a single 26course of conduct, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a   SB3442- 4 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 2sentenced to a term of not less than 6 years and not more than 328 years. 4    (e-5) (Blank).5    (e-7) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e-8), in 6cases involving reckless homicide in which the defendant: (1) 7was driving in a construction or maintenance zone, as defined 8in Section 11-605.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or (2) was 9operating a vehicle while failing or refusing to comply with 10any lawful order or direction of any authorized police officer 11or traffic control aide engaged in traffic control, the 12penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced 13to a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not 14less than 3 years and not more than 14 years.15    (e-8) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 16defendant caused the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a 17single course of conduct and: (1) was driving in a 18construction or maintenance zone, as defined in Section 1911-605.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or (2) was operating a 20vehicle while failing or refusing to comply with any lawful 21order or direction of any authorized police officer or traffic 22control aide engaged in traffic control, the penalty is a 23Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term of 24imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 6 25years and not more than 28 years.26    (e-9) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the   SB3442- 5 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1defendant drove a vehicle and used an incline in a roadway, 2such as a railroad crossing, bridge approach, or hill, to 3cause the vehicle to become airborne, and caused the deaths of 42 or more persons as part of a single course of conduct, the 5penalty is a Class 2 felony. 6    (e-10) In cases involving involuntary manslaughter or 7reckless homicide resulting in the death of a peace officer 8killed in the performance of his or her duties as a peace 9officer, the penalty is a Class 2 felony. 10    (e-11) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 11defendant unintentionally kills an individual while driving in 12a posted school zone, as defined in Section 11-605 of the 13Illinois Vehicle Code, while children are present or in a 14construction or maintenance zone, as defined in Section 1511-605.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when construction or 16maintenance workers are present the trier of fact may infer 17that the defendant's actions were performed recklessly where 18he or she was also either driving at a speed of more than 20 19miles per hour in excess of the posted speed limit or violating 20Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 21    (e-12) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e-13), 22in cases involving reckless homicide in which the offense was 23committed as result of a violation of subsection (c) of 24Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, the penalty is a 25Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term of 26imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 3   SB3442- 6 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1years and not more than 14 years.2    (e-13) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 3offense was committed as result of a violation of subsection 4(c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and the 5defendant caused the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a 6single course of conduct, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for 7which a person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 8be sentenced to a term of not less than 6 years and not more 9than 28 years. 10    (e-14) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 11defendant unintentionally kills an individual, the trier of 12fact may infer that the defendant's actions were performed 13recklessly where he or she was also violating subsection (c) 14of Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The penalty 15for a reckless homicide in which the driver also violated 16subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 17is a Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term 18of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 193 years and not more than 14 years. 20    (e-15) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 21defendant was operating a vehicle while failing or refusing to 22comply with subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois 23Vehicle Code resulting in the death of a firefighter or 24emergency medical services personnel in the performance of his 25or her official duties, the penalty is a Class 2 felony.26    (e-16) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the   SB3442- 7 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1defendant was operating a motor vehicle and violated 2subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 3resulting in the death of an individual, the penalty is a Class 42 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term of 5imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 6 6years and not more than 28 years. 7    (e-17) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 8defendant was operating a motor vehicle at a speed 100 or more 9miles per hour over the maximum speed limit resulting in the 10death of an individual, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for 11which a person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 12be sentenced to a term of not less than 6 years and not more 13than 28 years. 14    (f) In cases involving involuntary manslaughter in which 15the victim was a family or household member as defined in 16paragraph (3) of Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal 17Procedure of 1963, the penalty shall be a Class 2 felony, for 18which a person if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 19sentenced to a term of not less than 3 years and not more than 2014 years.21(Source: P.A. 101-173, eff. 1-1-20.) 22    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)23    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 24    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 25battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the   SB3442- 8 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 2following:3        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 4    or disfigurement, other than as provided in paragraph (6) 5    of this subsection.6        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 7    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 8    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 9    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 10    or a bomb or explosive compound.11        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 12    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 13    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 14    private security officer, correctional institution 15    employee, or Department of Human Services employee 16    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 17    sexually violent persons:18            (i) performing his or her official duties;19            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 20        official duties; or21            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 22        or her official duties.23        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 24    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 25    older.26        (5) Strangles another individual.   SB3442- 9 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1        (6) Causes great bodily harm to an individual while 2    operating a motor vehicle at a speed of 100 or more miles 3    per hour over the maximum speed limit. 4    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 5intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 6age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 7he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 8means:9        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 10    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 11    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 12    disability; or13        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 14    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 15    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 16    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 17aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 18by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person 19battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 20place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 21domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 22or other building, structure, or place used for religious 23worship.24    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 25aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 26by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual   SB3442- 10 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1battered to be any of the following:2        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.3        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 4    disability.5        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 6    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 7    building used for school purposes.8        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 9    fireman, private security officer, correctional 10    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 11    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 12    persons or sexually violent persons:13            (i) performing his or her official duties;14            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 15        official duties; or16            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 17        or her official duties.18        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency 19    medical services personnel, or utility worker:20            (i) performing his or her official duties;21            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 22        official duties; or23            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 24        or her official duties.25        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 26    unit of local government, or a school district, while   SB3442- 11 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1    performing his or her official duties.2        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 3    duties, or a transit passenger.4        (8) A taxi driver on duty.5        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 6    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 7    Code and the person without legal justification by any 8    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.9        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 10    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 11    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 12    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 13    process server.14        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 15    duties as a nurse. 16        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 17    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions 18    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 19    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 20    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 21    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 22    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 23    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 24    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 25    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 26    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits   SB3442- 12 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 2knowingly does any of the following:3        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 4    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 5    to another person.6        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 7    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 8    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 9    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 10    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 11    institution employee, or emergency management worker:12            (i) performing his or her official duties;13            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 14        official duties; or15            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 16        or her official duties.17        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 18    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 19    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 20    services personnel:21            (i) performing his or her official duties;22            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 23        official duties; or24            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 25        or her official duties.26        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a   SB3442- 13 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 2    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 3    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 4    school or in any part of a building used for school 5    purposes.6        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 7    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.8        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 9    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 10    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 11    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 12    private security officer, correctional institution 13    employee or emergency management worker:14            (i) performing his or her official duties;15            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 16        official duties; or17            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 18        or her official duties.19        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 20    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 21    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:22            (i) performing his or her official duties;23            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 24        official duties; or25            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 26        or her official duties.  SB3442- 14 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 2    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 3    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 4    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 5    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 6    any part of a building used for school purposes. 7    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 8commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 9or she does any of the following:10        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 11    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 12    24.8-0.1 of this Code.13        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 14    identity.15        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 16    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 17    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 18    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 19    another.20        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 21    the intent to disseminate the recording. 22    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 23aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 24he or she does any of the following:25        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 26    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled   SB3442- 15 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 2    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 3    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 4    substance.5        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 6    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 7    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 8    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 9    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 10    person any food containing any substance or object 11    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.12        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a 13    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 14    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 15    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 16    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 17    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 18    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 19    of Human Services.20    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 21battery is a Class 3 felony.22    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 23(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.24    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 25(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.26    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a   SB3442- 16 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 2involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 3(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 4of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 5physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 6the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 7    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 8Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 9permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 10be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 11religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 12building, structure, or place used for religious worship. 13    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 14felony if:15        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 16    instrument while committing the offense;17        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 18    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 19    committing the offense; or20        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 21    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 22    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 23    state. 24    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(6) is a 25Class 2 felony for which the person shall be sentenced to a 26term of imprisonment of a minimum of 3 years and a maximum of   SB3442- 17 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b120 years. 2    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 3Class X felony.4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 5Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 6of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 7years.8    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 9Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 10of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 11years.12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 13(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 14be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 15and a maximum of 60 years.16    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6), 17(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 18be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 19and a maximum of 60 years.20    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 21Class X felony, except that:22        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 23    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 24    imprisonment imposed by the court;25        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 26    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be   SB3442- 18 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b1    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;2        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 3    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 4    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 5    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 6    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 7    imprisonment imposed by the court.8     9    (i) Definitions. In this Section:10    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 11the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 12Violence Shelters Act.13    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 14Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.15    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 16structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 17or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence 18pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 19Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 20of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 21who is going to or from such a building or other structure.22    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of 23the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 24include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 25Code. 26    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section   SB3442- 19 -LRB104 16838 RLC 30247 b124-1 of this Code.2    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 316-0.1 of this Code. 4    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 5breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 6applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 7by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 8(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 10severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.